Vermont, session 2025-2026, H563.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 12 V.S.A. chapter 223 is added to read:
CHAPTER 223. UNCONSENTED USE OF PERSON’S LIKENESS
§ 7401. APPLICATION AND CONSTRUCTION; PURPOSE
(a) In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall be given to
the following:
(1) Access to essential human and medical care is fundamental to the
health, safety, and well-being of all Vermonters, particularly vulnerable
populations.
VT LEG #386231 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.563
2026 Page 2 of 6
(2) Individuals seeking such care are often in moments of profound
vulnerability, seeking assistance for deeply personal circumstances, and have a
deeply personal and objectively reasonable expectation of privacy when
accessing these critical services.
(3) The contemporary societal landscape mandates an expansive
understanding of “care” to encompass not only traditional medical facilities but
also critical human services that address fundamental needs, health, and well-
being, such as homeless shelters providing medical-adjacent services like
medication management.
(4) National public policy, as exemplified by the Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA), establishes a powerful norm that
matters concerning one’s health and the act of seeking medical-related care are
inherently private.
(5) The commercial exploitation of individuals’ images at the threshold
of facilities providing essential care undermines this national policy by
potentially deterring vulnerable individuals from accessing critical services due
to fear of public exposure of their private health circumstances.
(6) While the First Amendment generally protects photography in public
places, this protection is not absolute, especially when images are used for
purely commercial purposes that invade an individual’s right to privacy or
control over the individual’s own likeness.
VT LEG #386231 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.563
2026 Page 3 of 6
(7) Vermont recognizes the tort of appropriation of likeness, which
protects an individual’s right to control the commercial use of the individual’s
name or image.
(8) There is a compelling governmental interest in ensuring safe and
unimpeded access to health care facilities and protecting the health and safety
of citizens.
(b) The purpose of this act is to:
(1) recognize and protect a “functional curtilage of care” around the
immediate entrances of essential human and medical care facilities,
establishing a heightened and objectively reasonable expectation of privacy in
those sensitive areas;
(2) prohibit the unauthorized commercial exploitation of individuals’
images taken around the immediate entrances of essential human and medical
care facilities; and
(3) ensure unfettered access to essential care by mitigating deterrents
caused by unwanted visual intrusion for commercial gain.
§ 7402. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Care” means any service provided to an individual that addresses
fundamental needs, health, and well-being, including medical treatment,
mental health services, reproductive health services, substance abuse treatment,
VT LEG #386231 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.563
2026 Page 4 of 6
shelter, food assistance, or the secure holding and dispensing of prescribed
medications or other health-related support.
(2) “Commercial exploitation” means the unauthorized use, publication,
display, or dissemination of an individual’s image for advertising, marketing,
or any other commercial purpose, including the sale of images, inclusion in
commercial publications, or use in promotional materials, where such use is
not connected to a legitimate newsgathering activity, journalistic purpose, or
legitimate public interest nexus.
(3) “Essential human and medical care facility” means any building or
premises where “care” is regularly provided, including abortion clinics, general
hospital facilities, emergency medical treatment centers, methadone
dispensaries, homeless shelters providing medical-adjacent services, and
similar facilities.
(4) “Functional curtilage of care” means the immediate area surrounding
any entrance, exit, or designated access point of an essential human and
medical care facility. This area functions as a vital threshold to deeply private
domains of human experience and vulnerability, where intimate activities
associated with seeking care occur. For the purposes of this chapter, this area
extends up to 25 feet from such entrance, exit, or access point.
(5) “Image” means any photograph, video recording, or digital
representation that captures an individual’s likeness.
VT LEG #386231 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.563
2026 Page 5 of 6
§ 7403. PROHIBITED ACTS
(a) No person shall knowingly or recklessly capture, record, transmit, or
otherwise obtain or use an image of an individual within the functional
curtilage of care of an essential human and medical care facility if the primary
intent is the commercial exploitation of that image without the express written
consent of the individual depicted.
(b) Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to:
(1) a federal law enforcement officer or a law enforcement officer
certified as a law enforcement officer by the Vermont Criminal Justice
Training Council pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 2358, for legitimate law enforcement
purposes;
(2) a security guard performing the security guard’s official duties who
is licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 59;
(3) legitimate newsgathering activities by a journalist if the image is
used in connection with a newsworthy event or matter of legitimate public
interest, and not primarily for the commercial exploitation of the person’s
likeness; or
(4) a person recording for the person’s personal use, provided the
recording is not subsequently used for commercial exploitation.
VT LEG #386231 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.563
2026 Page 6 of 6
§ 7404. REMEDIES AND ENFORCEMENT
(a) Civil action. Any person whose image is commercially exploited in
violation of this chapter may bring a civil action in the Civil Division of the
Superior Court against the person or entity responsible for the exploitation.
(b) Damages. A prevailing plaintiff in an action brought under this section
may recover:
(1) actual damages, including damages for emotional distress and any
financial harm caused by the commercial exploitation;
(2) punitive damages if the violation was intentional or malicious; and
(3) reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
(c) Injunctive relief. The court may grant injunctive relief to prevent or
restrain violations of this chapter.
§ 7405. CONSTRUCTION
This chapter shall be construed broadly to effectuate its purpose of
protecting a person’s privacy when accessing essential human and medical
care. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit existing rights or
remedies under common law, including the tort of appropriation of likeness, or
under other applicable statutes.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386231 v.1